Nevada, session 83, SB435.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 370 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Directory” means the directory created and
maintained pursuant to section 8 of this act.
Sec. 4. “Timely filed premarket tobacco product application”
means an application filed pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387j for a
vapor product containing nicotine derived from tobacco marketed
in the United States as of August 8, 2016, that was submitted to the
United States Food and Drug Administration on or before
September 9, 2020, and accepted for filing.
Sec. 5. “Vapor product”:
1. Means any noncombustible product containing nicotine
that employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit or
other electronic, chemical or mechanical means, regardless of the
shape or size thereof, that can be used to produce vapor from
nicotine or any other substance in a solution or other form, the
use or inhalation of which simulates smoking.
2. Includes, without limitation:
(a) An electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah or
vape pen, or a similar product or device; and
(b) The components of such a product or device, whether or
not sold separately, including, without limitation, a vapor
cartridge or other container of nicotine or any other substance in
a solution or other form that is intended to be used with or in an
electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah or vape pen, or a
similar product or device, atomizer, cartomizer, digital display,
clearomizer, tank system, flavor, programmable software or other
similar product or device. As used in this paragraph, “component”
means a product intended primarily or exclusively to be used with
or in an electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah or vape
pen, or a similar product or device.
-
*SB435_R2*

– 4 –
3. Does not include any product:
(a) Regulated by the United States Food and Drug
Administration pursuant to subchapter V of the Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
(b) Subject to the excise tax on cannabis or cannabis products
pursuant to NRS 372A.200 to 372A.380, inclusive.
(c) Purchased by a person who holds a current, valid medical
cannabis establishment license pursuant to chapter 678B of NRS.
Sec. 6. 1. A manufacturer of a vapor product that is sold
for retail sale in this State or to a consumer in this State, whether
directly or through an importer, wholesaler, distributor, retailer or
similar intermediary or intermediaries shall, not later than
August 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, execute and deliver to
the Attorney General, on a form and in a manner prescribed by
the Attorney General, a certification under penalty of perjury
affirming that the manufacturer is compliant with the provisions
of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act and has done either of the
following for each vapor product to be sold at retail in this State or
to a consumer in this State:
(a) Received a marketing granted order for the vapor product
from the United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to
21 U.S.C. § 387j; or
(b) Submitted a timely filed premarket tobacco product
application for the vapor product to the United States Food and
Drug Administration pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387j and either:
(1) The application remains under review by the United
States Food and Drug Administration; or
(2) The United States Food and Drug Administration has
issued a marketing denial order for the vapor product, but:
(I) The manufacturer of the vapor product has appealed
the marketing denial order to the United States Food and Drug
Administration or has filed suit in federal court to challenge the
marketing denial order and the appeal or suit is still pending; or
(II) The United States Food and Drug Administration or
a federal court has issued a stay order or injunction suspending
the marking denial order pending an appeal by the manufacturer
of the vapor product.
2. The certification executed and delivered pursuant to
subsection 1 must:
(a) Separately list each brand name, product name, category
(e.g., disposable vapor product, power unit, device, e-liquid
cartridge, e-liquid pod, etc.) and flavor for each vapor product that
is sold in this State.
(b) Be accompanied by:
(1) A copy of:
-
*SB435_R2*

– 5 –
(I) The cover page of the marketing granted order
issued by the United States Food and Drug Administration
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387j;
(II) The cover page of the timely filed premarket tobacco
product application and the acceptance letter issued by the United
States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to 21 U.S.C.
§ 387j for the application;
(III) A document issued by United States Food and
Drug Administration or by a court confirming that the premarket
tobacco product application has received a marketing denial order
which has been suspended by the issuance of a stay order or
injunction by United States Food and Drug Administration or a
federal court pending an appeal by the manufacturer;
(IV) A document issued by the United States Food and
Drug Administration demonstrating that the vapor product is
temporarily exempt from any requirement for a premarket tobacco
product application; or
(V) The cover page of the marketing denial order and
evidence that the manufacturer has appealed the order or filed suit
in federal court to challenge the marketing denial order and that
the appeal or suit is still pending; and
(2) A payment of an initial fee of $6,300 for each type of
vapor product and an annual renewal fee of $6,300.
3. The information submitted by the manufacturer pursuant
to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 is
confidential and not a public book or record within the meaning
of NRS 239.010 and the manufacturer may redact such
confidential information.
Sec. 7. A manufacturer of a vapor product required to
execute and deliver a certification pursuant to section 6 of this act
shall notify the Attorney General not later than 30 days after any
material change to the certification, including, without limitation,
the issuance of:
1. A marketing granted order pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387j;
2. A marketing denial order pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387j;
3. An order by the United States Food and Drug
Administration requiring the manufacturer to remove the vapor
product from the market temporarily or permanently;
4. Notice of an order or action by the United States Food and
Drug Administration or any court that affects the ability of the
vapor product to be introduced or delivered into interstate
commerce for commercial distribution in the United States; or
5. Notice of any action by the United State Food and Drug
Administration which results in the vapor product no longer being
-
*SB435_R2*

– 6 –
exempt from the requirement for a premarket tobacco product
application.
Sec. 8. 1. On or before October 1, 2026, the Department
shall create, maintain and make publicly available on the Internet
website of the Department a directory that lists all manufacturers
of vapor products and all vapor products, including brand names,
product names, categories (e.g., disposable vapor product, e-liquid,
e-liquid cartridge, e-liquid pod, power unit, etc.) and flavors for
which certifications have been executed and delivered in
compliance with section 6 of this act to the Attorney General.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Update the directory described in subsection 1 as necessary
to ensure the accuracy of the directory; and
(b) Establish a process to provide licensed retailers,
distributors and other relevant parties notice of the initial
publication of the directory and any changes made to the directory
in the immediately preceding month.
Sec. 9. 1. A manufacturer of vapor products or a vapor
product, including, without limitation, a brand name, product
name, category or flavor, may be denied listing or removed from
the directory by the Department if the Department determines that
any of the following apply:
(a) The manufacturer failed to provide a complete and
accurate certification pursuant to section 6 of this act;
(b) The manufacturer executed and delivered a certification
that does not comply with the requirements of section 6 of this act;
(c) The manufacturer failed to include payment of the fee
required by section 6 of this act;
(d) The manufacturer sold vapor products in this State during
a period when either the manufacturer or the vapor product sold
was not certified and listed in the directory;
(e) The information provided by the manufacturer pursuant to
section 6 of this act is determined by the Department to contain
false information, material misrepresentations or omissions;
(f) The manufacturer was convicted of a crime, in this State or
any other state, relating to the manufacture, sale or distribution of
vapor products; and
(g) The manufacturer failed to report to the Department:
(1) That the manufacturer was convicted of a crime, in this
State or any other state, relating to the manufacture, sale or
distribution of vapor products; or
(2) The existence or result of any investigation of the
manufacturer, in this State or any other state, for the commission
of a crime relating to the manufacture, sale or distribution of
vapor products or for any act or omission that would be grounds
-
*SB435_R2*

– 7 –
for the removal of the manufacturer from the directory had the act
or omission occurred in this State.
2. Any determination of the Department not to include in or
to remove from the directory a manufacturer or vapor product is a
final decision for the purposes of judicial review.
3. The Department shall notify each wholesale dealer and
retail dealer of vapor products when any changes are made to the
directory, including, without limitation, when a manufacturer or
vapor product, including, without limitation, a brand name,
product name, category or flavor, is added to or removed from the
directory. The Department shall provide the notice by electronic
mail sent to the electronic mail address of each wholesale dealer
or retail dealer that is on file with the Department.
4. Before removing a manufacturer or vapor product from
the directory, the Department shall notify the manufacturer that
the manufacturer or vapor product will be removed from the
directory and the reason for the removal. A manufacturer of vapor
products shall have 15 days from the date of service of the notice
provided pursuant to this subsection to cure any violation or
deficiency or otherwise establish that the manufacturer or vapor
products should be included in the directory. Unless the
Department determines that the violation or deficiency has been
cured, the manufacturer or vapor product will be removed from
the directory.
5. A retail dealer of vapor products may, not later than 60
days after receiving notice pursuant to subsection 3 that a
manufacturer of vapor products or any vapor product, including
any brand name, product name, category or flavor, has been
removed from the directory, sell any vapor products in its
possession to which the notice pertains or which are from the
manufacturer to which the notice pertains. The retail dealer shall,
at the expiration of the 60-day period, turn over possession of any
unsold vapor products to the Department for disposal.
6. A wholesale dealer of vapor products shall not purchase
for resale vapor products which have been removed from the
directory or vapor products that are from a manufacturer who has
been removed from the directory, or for which the wholesale
dealer has received a notice of removal pursuant to subsection 3,
until the manufacturer or vapor products are re-entered into the
directory by the Department.
7. A wholesale dealer of vapor products who receives a notice
pursuant to subsection 3 that a manufacturer or vapor product has
been removed from the directory shall, not later than 20 days after
receiving the notice, identify and set aside any vapor products to
which the notice pertains or which are from the manufacturer to
-
*SB435_R2*

– 8 –
which the notice pertains for sale or distribution outside of the
borders of this State and keep a record of the destination state for
such vapor products, or return any such vapor products to the
manufacturer or wholesale dealer.
8. Not less than 30 days following removal from the directory,
the vapor products of a manufacturer identified in the notice of
removal and intended for sale in this State are subject to seizure
from distributors and retailers, forfeiture from distributors and
retailers, destruction or disposal and such products must not be
purchased or sold for retail sale in this State or to a consumer in
this State. The cost of any seizure, forfeiture, destruction or
disposal must be borne by the person from whom the vapor
products are confiscated.
9. The Department, its agents, sheriffs within their respective
counties and all other peace officers of the State of Nevada may
seize any vapor product offered for sale which is not listed in the
directory or any vapor product found to be sold, offered for sale or
in the possession of any manufacturer, wholesale dealer or retail
dealer more than 60 days after receipt of the notice pursuant to
subsection 3. A sheriff or other peace officer who seizes vapor
products pursuant to this subsection shall provide written
notification of the seizure to the Department not later than 5
working days after the seizure. The notification must include the
reason for the seizure. After consultation with the Department, the
sheriff or other peace officer may transmit the vapor products to
the Department for destruction or disposal if the Department
approves the transmission. The sheriff or other peace officer who
seizes any vapor product may, if he or she does not transmit the
vapor products to the Department, destroy the vapor products.
Sec. 10. 1. Beginning on January 1, 2027, or on the date
that the Department first makes the directory available for public
inspection on the Internet website of the Department, whichever is
later, vapor products that are not included in the directory may not
be sold for retail sale in this State or to a consumer in this State,
either directly or through an importer, distributor, wholesaler,
retailer or similar intermediary or intermediaries.
2. Each retailer shall have 60 days after the date that the
Department first makes the directory available for inspection on
the Internet website of the Department to sell vapor products that
were in the inventory of the retailer, and not included in the
directory, or to remove such vapor products from the inventory of
the retailer.
3. Each distributor or wholesaler shall have 60 days from the
date that the Department first makes the directory available for
inspection on the Internet website of the Department to remove
-
*SB435_R2*

– 9 –
those vapor products intended for sale in this State or to a
consumer in this State from the inventory of the retailer.
4. Not less than 60 days following publication of the
directory, vapor products not listed in the directory and intended
for sale in this State or to a consumer in this State are subject to
seizure, forfeiture and destruction or disposal. Such vapor
products may not be purchased or sold for retail sale in this State
or to a consumer in this State except as otherwise provided in this
section or section 9 of this act. The cost of any seizure, forfeiture
and destruction or disposal must be borne by the person from
whom the vapor products are confiscated.
Sec. 11. 1. Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer of
vapor products that has not registered to do business in this State,
as a condition precedent to having its name or its vapor products
listed and retained in the directory, shall appoint and continually
engage without interruption the services of an agent in this State
to act as its agent for the service of process on whom all process,
in any action or proceeding against it concerning or arising out of
the enforcement of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act, may be
served in any manner authorized by law.
2. Service upon an agent pursuant to this section constitutes
legal and valid service of process on the manufacturer. The
manufacturer shall provide the name, address, phone number and
proof of the appointment and availability of such agent to, and to
the satisfaction of, the Attorney General.
3. The manufacturer shall provide notice to the Attorney
General at least 30 calendar days before the termination of the
authority of an agent appointed pursuant to this section and shall
provide proof to the satisfaction of the Attorney General of the
appointment of a new agent not less than 5 calendar days before
the termination of the appointment of an existing agent. If an
agent terminates his or her appointment as an agent, the
manufacturer shall notify the Attorney General of that
termination at least 5 calendar days before the termination and
include with that notification proof to the satisfaction of the
Attorney General of the appointment of a new agent.
4. A manufacturer whose vapor products are sold in this
State or to a consumer in this State, without appointing or
designating an agent as required by this section, shall be deemed
to have appointed the Secretary of State as the agent and the
manufacturer may be proceeded against in courts of this State by
service of process upon the Secretary of State, except that the
appointment of the Secretary of State as the agent does not satisfy
the condition precedent to having the vapor products of the
manufacturer listed or retained in the directory.
-
*SB435_R2*

– 10 –
Sec. 12. 1. Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer of
vapor products that has not registered to do business in this State
as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as a condition
precedent to having its name or its vapor products listed and
retained in the directory, submit to the Attorney General a surety
bond or other cash security payable to the State of Nevada in the
amount of $25,000. The bond must be posted by a corporate surety
located within the United States.
2. The bond must be conditioned on the performance by the
manufacturer of all requirements and obligations imposed by
sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act. A surety on a
manufacturer’s bond is liable up to the amount of the bond, and
the State may execute on the surety bond, for the payment of fines
and penalties imposed on the manufacturer under section 14 of
this act and for the costs of seizure and destruction of vapor
products sold in violation of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
If the State executes on the surety bond, it may require the
manufacturer to provide an additional bond as a condition
precedent for retaining the manufacturer or its vapor products in
the directory.
3. A surety on a bond furnished by a manufacturer as
provided in this section must be released and discharged from
liability to the State accruing on the bond 60 days after the date on
which the surety lodges with the Attorney General a written
request to be released and discharged. This provision does not
operate to relieve, release or discharge the surety from liability
already accrued or which accrues before the expiration of the 60-
day period. The Attorney General shall, upon receiving any such
request, notify the manufacturer who furnished the bond. Unless
the manufacturer, on or before the expiration of the 60-day
period, files with the Attorney General a new bond, with the surety
approved by and acceptable to the Attorney General, the Attorney
General shall remove the manufacturer and its vapor products
from the directory.
Sec. 13. Each retailer, distributor and wholesaler that sells
or distributes vapor products in this State is subject to at least two
unannounced compliance checks annually, by the Department or
the Attorney General or any designated agent of the Department
or Attorney General, for purposes of enforcing the provisions of
sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act. Unannounced follow-up
compliance checks of all noncompliant retailers, distributors and
wholesalers must be conducted not later than 30 days after any
violation of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act. The Department
and the Attorney General shall share any information obtained
from compliance checks. The Department shall publish the results
-
*SB435_R2*

– 11 –
of all compliance checks at least annually and shall make the
results available to the public on request.
Sec. 14. 1. In addition to any other penalty authorized by
law, the Attorney General may impose the following civil penalty
on a retailer, distributor, wholesaler or importer who sells or
offers for sale a vapor product for retail sale in this State or to a
consumer in this State that is not included in the directory:
(a) For a first violation, $2,500.
(b) For a second violation within a 12-month period, $5,000.
(c) For a third violation within a 12-month period, $7,500.
(d) For a fourth or subsequent violation within a 12-month
period, $10,000 and the Department may revoke any license of the
retailer, distributor, wholesaler or importer that is issued by the
Department pursuant to this chapter.
2. A manufacturer whose vapor products are not listed in the
directory and who causes the products that are not listed to be sold
for retail sale in this State, whether directly or indirectly through
an importer, distributor, wholesaler, retailer or similar
intermediary or intermediaries is subject to a civil penalty of
$10,000 for each individual vapor product offered for sale in
violation of this section. In addition, any manufacturer that falsely
represents any information required by a certification pursuant to
section 6 of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor for each false
representation.
3. In an action to enforce the provisions of sections 2 to 16,
inclusive, of this act, the State is entitled to recover costs,
including the costs of investigation, expert witness fees and
reasonable attorney’s fees.
4. A second or subsequent violation of this section constitutes
a deceptive trade practice for the purposes of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive.
5. All fees and penalties collected by the Attorney General
pursuant to this section and sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
must be deposited in the Account for Vapor Product Enforcement
created by section 14.5 of this act.
Sec. 14.5. 1. The Account for Vapor Product Enforcement
is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Account must be
administered by the Attorney General.
2. The money in the Account must only be used by the
Attorney General and the Department:
(a) For the administration and enforcement of sections 2 to 16,
inclusive, and 18 of this act, including, without limitation,
contracting with a facility that has been issued a permit to treat or
store vapor products; and
-
*SB435_R2*

– 12 –
(b) To pay the costs, including, without limitation, the
personnel costs of:
(1) The Attorney General to process certifications pursuant
to section 6 of this act; and
(2) The Department to operate and maintain the directory
pursuant to section 8 of this act.
3. Any claims against the Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
4. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the
fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
Sec. 15. 1. On or before January 31 of each year, the
Department shall prepare and submit a report to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) An update on the status of the directory, including, without
limitation, a discussion of the date of initial publication, dates of
updated versions and issues the Department has encountered
relating to making updates to the directory;
(b) Any revenue and expenditures related to the administration
of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act;
(c) Any enforcement activities undertaken pursuant to sections
2 to 16, inclusive, of this act; and
(d) A copy of the most recent version of the directory.
Sec. 16. The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 17. Any cigarette, product containing, made or derived
from tobacco, vapor product, alternative nicotine product or
product containing, made or derived from nicotine sold by a
person without a license required by this chapter is subject to
seizure. A sheriff or other peace officer shall provide written
notification of any such seizure to the Department not later than 5
working days after the seizure. The notification must include the
reason for the seizure. After consultation with the Department, the
sheriff or other peace officer may transmit the vapor products to
the Department for destruction or disposal if the Department
approves the transmission. The sheriff or other peace officer who
seizes any vapor product may, if he or she does not transmit the
vapor products to the Department, destroy the vapor products.
Sec. 18. 1. It is unlawful for any person to sell, give, deliver
or furnish to a person in this State a product that contains a
nicotine analogue.
-
*SB435_R2*

– 13 –
2. A person who violates the provisions of this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
3. In addition to any criminal penalty imposed pursuant to
subsection 2, a person who violates the provisions of this section is
subject to:
(a) A civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for each
violation; and
(b) For a second or subsequent violation, the suspension or
revocation of the license of the person by the Department of
Taxation, if the person is licensed pursuant to this chapter.
4. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section must be
deposited in the Account for Vapor Product Enforcement created
by section 14.5 of this act.
5. As used in this section, “nicotine analogue” means a
substance, the chemical structure of which is substantially similar
to the chemical structure of nicotine or which has, purports to
have or is represented to have an effect on the central nervous
system that is similar to or greater than the effect on the central
nervous system of nicotine. Factors relevant to determining
whether a substance is a nicotine analogue include, without
limitation, the marketing, advertising and labeling of the
substance, and whether the substance has been manufactured,
formulated, sold, distributed or marketed with the intent to avoid
the provisions of this chapter or other any applicable provision of
law.
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19.5. NRS 370.521 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.521 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2, 4
and 5, a person shall not sell, distribute or offer to sell cigarettes,
cigarette paper, any product containing, made or derived from
tobacco, any vapor product, any alternative nicotine product or any
product containing, made or derived from nicotine to any person
under the age of 21 years.
2. A person shall be deemed to be in compliance with the
provisions of subsection 1 if, before the person sells, distributes or
offers to sell to another any item described in subsection 1, the
person:
(a) Demands that the other person present a valid driver’s
license, permanent resident card, tribal identification card or other
written or documentary evidence which shows that the other person
is 21 years of age or older;
(b) Is presented a valid driver’s license, permanent resident card,
tribal identification card or other written or documentary evidence
which shows that the other person is 21 years of age or older; and
-
*SB435_R2*

– 14 –
(c) Reasonably relies upon the driver’s license, permanent
resident card, tribal identification card or other written or
documentary evidence presented by the other person.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person
shall not sell, distribute or offer to sell cigarettes, cigarette paper or
other tobacco products to any person under 40 years of age without
first performing age verification through enhanced controls that
utilize a scanning technology or other automated, software-based
system to verify that the person is 21 years of age or older. A person
who violates this subsection is liable for a civil penalty of $100 for
each offense. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a
person selling, distributing or offering to sell cigarettes, cigarette
paper or other tobacco products in a face-to-face transaction that
occurs in an area within a casino where loitering by persons who are
under 21 years of age is already prohibited pursuant to NRS
463.350. As used in this subsection, “casino” means an
establishment which holds a nonrestricted license as defined in NRS
463.0177 and which is operating 16 or more slot machines together
with any other game, race book or sports pool.
4. The employer of a person who is under 21 years of age may,
for the purpose of allowing the person to handle or transport any
item described in subsection 1 in the course of the person’s lawful
employment, provide an item described in subsection 1 to the person
under 21 years of age.
5. The provisions of this section do not apply to any product
regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration under
Subchapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21
U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
6. A person who violates subsection 1 is liable for a civil
penalty of:
(a) For the first violation within a 24-month period, $100.
(b) For the second violation within a 24-month period, $250.
(c) For the third and any subsequent violation within a 24-month
period, $500.
7. If an employee or agent of a licensee has violated
subsection 1:
(a) For the first violation within a 24-month period at the same
premises, the licensee is liable for a civil penalty of $2,500.
(b) For the second violation within a 24-month period at the
same premises, the licensee is liable for a civil penalty of $5,000.
(c) For the third violation within a 24-month period at the same
premises, the licensee is liable for a civil penalty of $7,500.
(d) For the fourth and any subsequent violation within a 24-
month period at the same premises, the licensee is liable for a civil
penalty of $10,000 [.] , and any cigarette, cigarette paper, product
-
*SB435_R2*

– 15 –
containing, made or derived from tobacco, vapor product,
alternative nicotine product or product containing, made or
derived from nicotine offered for sale in violation of subsection 1
may be seized. A sheriff or other peace officer shall provide
written notification of any such seizure to the Department not later
than 5 working days after the seizure. The notification must
include the reason for the seizure.
8. A peace officer or any person performing an inspection
pursuant to NRS 202.2496 may issue a notice of infraction for a
violation of this section. A notice of infraction must be issued on a
form prescribed by the Department and must contain:
(a) The location at which the violation occurred;
(b) The date and time of the violation;
(c) The name of the establishment at which the violation
occurred;
(d) The signature of the person who issued the notice of
infraction;
(e) A copy of the section which allegedly is being violated;
(f) Information advising the person to whom the notice of
infraction is issued of the manner in which, and the time within
which, the person must submit an answer to the notice of infraction;
and
(g) Such other pertinent information as the peace officer or
person performing the inspection pursuant to NRS 202.2496
determines is necessary.
9. A notice of infraction issued pursuant to subsection 8 or a
facsimile thereof must be filed with the Department and retained by
the Department and is deemed to be a public record of matters
which are observed pursuant to a duty imposed by law and is prima
facie evidence of the facts alleged in the notice.
10. A person to whom a notice of infraction is issued pursuant
to subsection 8 shall respond to the notice by:
(a) Admitting the violation stated in the notice and paying to the
State of Nevada the applicable civil penalty set forth in subsection 3,
6 or 7.
(b) Denying liability for the infraction by notifying the
Department and requesting a hearing in the manner indicated on the
notice of infraction. Upon receipt of a request for a hearing pursuant
to this paragraph, the Department shall provide the person
submitting the request an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to
chapter 233B of NRS.
11. Any money collected by the State of Nevada from a civil
penalty pursuant to this section must be deposited in a separate
account in the State General Fund to be used for the enforcement of
this section and NRS 202.2493 and 202.2494.
-
*SB435_R2*

– 16 –
12. As used in this section, “licensee” means a person who
holds a license issued by the Department pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 20. NRS 370.593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.593 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
licensee shall retain for not less than 5 years all receipts, invoices,
records, inventory records and financial statements necessary to
substantiate information submitted by the licensee to the
Department in any report or return required pursuant to this chapter.
2. If a licensee fails to submit a return or report which is
required by this chapter, the licensee shall retain for not less than 8
years all receipts, invoices, records, inventory records and financial
statements necessary to substantiate any information which the
licensee was required to include in the report or return which the
licensee failed to submit.
3. Upon request, a licensee shall provide access to and permit
the Department to inspect, examine, photocopy and audit all
receipts, invoices, records, inventory records and financial
statements retained by the licensee pursuant to subsections 1 and 2
and all records and financial statements relating to the gross income
of the licensee.
4. Upon request, a licensee shall provide verification of his or
her gross income and any other matters affecting the enforcement of
the provisions of this chapter.
5. The Department may demand access to and inspect,
examine, photocopy and audit all receipts, invoices, records,
inventory records and financial statements of any affiliate of a
licensee who the Department knows or reasonably believes is
involved in the financing, operation or management of the licensee.
The inspection, examination, photocopying or audit may take place
on the premises of the affiliate or another location, as practicable.
6. The Executive Director or any person authorized in writing
by the Executive Director may issue a subpoena to compel the
attendance of witnesses at a hearing held by the Department or to
compel the production of records.
7. The Department may share information obtained pursuant
to this section with other federal, state or local agencies only for
purposes of enforcement of the corresponding laws of other states.
Sec. 21. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
-
*SB435_R2*

– 17 –
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
-
*SB435_R2*

– 18 –
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 6 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
-
*SB435_R2*

– 19 –
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 21.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for the purposes
-
*SB435_R2*

– 20 –
of carrying out the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this
act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $408,479
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $145,946
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 22. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 23. 1. This section and section 21.5 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 to 21, inclusive, and 22 of this act become
effective on January 1, 2026.
H
-
*SB435_R2*